Rhode Island, session 2025, SB899.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 39-3-7.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-3 entitled "Regulatory
Powers of Administration" is hereby amended to read as follows:
39-3-7.1. Prohibited practices.
The use of electrical “master-meters,” so-called, in apartment or tenement houses, mobile
home parks, or other similar residential complexes is permitted; containing more than ten (10)
apartments or dwelling units is hereby prohibited; provided, however, that whenever a master-
meter customer provides electricity to users who are tenants of such a residential complex, the
master-meter customer shall not charge the user tenants a rate in excess of the rate that would apply
if such users received electricity directly from a public utility this section shall only apply to
apartment houses, construction of which is commenced after July 1, 1977. Each apartment or
dwelling unit shall have a measuring device or meter for the purpose of measuring the electricity
used only by that apartment. The commission shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations
to carry out the purposes and provisions of this section; provided, however, that this section shall
not apply to the multifamily dwellings constructed for the exclusive use of persons who are elderly
and/or disabled through public financing, whenever the organization sponsoring the construction
shall elect to use a single meter for all, or designated portions, of the housing.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000905
========
LC000905 - Page 2 of 3